Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1938YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 714 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 461A.10A Restrictions on acquiring 1 real property. 2 1. The department shall not acquire real property available 3 for sale at a public auction for real property. The department 4 shall only acquire real property from a willing donor or 5 willing seller, who shall not be under any compulsion by the 6 department. The department shall not acquire real property for 7 more than appraised value from a nonprofit corporation that 8 directly purchased real property for sale at a public auction. 9 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the department may acquire 10 real property available for sale at a public auction or from 11 a nonprofit corporation that acquired the real property at a 12 public auction if the acquisition is in furtherance of a local 13 or statewide conservation or recreation plan and approved by 14 the commission. 15 3. For purposes of this section, âauctionâ includes but is 16 not limited to an auction by electronic means, an auction by 17 sealed bid, or a conventional oral auction. 18 Sec. 2. Section 461A.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. The commission may accept gifts of land or other 21 property, subject to section 461A.10, or the use of lands or 22 other property for a term of years, and improve and use the 23 land as public state parks. 24